South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3542.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 9-1-1790(A)(2)(a) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (a) the member retired before January 2, 2013 2026; SECTION 2.  Section 9-11-90(4)(a)(ii)(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) the member retired before January 2, 2013 2026; SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----